Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 3 Security Guard Division

Cross references.

Employment of security guards to protect property of Georgia Building Authority, §

50-9-9

.

35-2-70.
Establishment.

The commissioner is authorized, with the approval of the board, to establish a Security Guard Division within the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 1.

35-2-71.
Powers and duties of security guards.

While in the performance of their duties, such security guards shall have the same powers of arrest and the same powers to enforce law and order as the sheriff of the county and the chief of police of the municipality in this state in which any such security guards are performing their duties.

While in the performance of their duties, such security guards shall also be authorized to exercise such powers and duties as are authorized by law for members of the Uniform Division of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35.

35-2-72.
Compensation, uniforms, and equipment of security guards.

All persons employed as security guards shall be compensated in an amount to be prescribed by the commissioner and shall be furnished with and shall wear such distinctive uniforms and equipment as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 3.

35-2-73.
Security guards for protection of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, and their families and executive department; transportation of family members at state expense.

The commissioner shall be authorized to employ such number of security guards as may be necessary to keep watch over and protect the Governor and members of his immediate family, the Lieutenant Governor and members of his immediate family, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and members of his immediate family, the executive department at the state capitol or at any other place as the executive department may be moved, the executive center or other residence of the Governor, the residences and offices of the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and such other state property and individuals as may be directed by the Governor.

Members of the Governor’s family, the Lieutenant Governor’s family, and the Speaker’s family for whom protection is provided by the Security Guard Division, when traveling with the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, or the Speaker, as the case may be, when traveling on state related business at the request of the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, or the Speaker, as the case may be, or when in the judgment of the commissioner security considerations so dictate, may be transported by means of state owned transportation facilities, when appropriate, or at state expense by private carrier, when the use of such state owned facilities are not practical or appropriate.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 143, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 684, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 35.

35-2-74.
Governor to prescribe coverage by State Personnel Board.

The Governor is authorized, in his discretion, to direct by executive order that the employees of the Security Guard Division shall be covered by the rules of the State Personnel Board and in such order shall specify the date on which the rules shall become applicable to such personnel.

The application of the rules of the State Personnel Board to employees of the Security Guard Division shall not affect any other personnel of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-49/HB 642.

Cross references.

State Personnel Board generally, § 45-20-1 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-2-75.
Adoption of rules, regulations, and orders by board.

The board shall be authorized to promulgate and adopt such rules, regulations, and orders in regard to security guards as in its judgment public service may demand.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 5.